Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4903
Leaving child at a hospital, a staffed fire station, a staffed law enforcement agency, or an emergency care provider; no prosecution for crime; custody of child; duty.

(1) No person shall be prosecuted for any crime based solely upon the act of leaving a child ninety days old or younger in the custody of an employee on duty at: (a) A hospital licensed by the State of Nebraska; (b) a staffed fire station; (c) a staffed law enforcement agency; or (d) an emergency care provider.

(2) The hospital, staffed fire station, staffed law enforcement agency, or emergency care provider shall promptly contact appropriate authorities to take custody of the child.

Laws 2008, LB157, § 1;

Laws 2008, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 29-121;

Laws 2024, LB876, § 3.